Utah statutes.
63K-4-201.   Authority of governor -- Federal assistance -- Fraud or willful
misstatement in application for financial assistance -- Penalty.
(1)  In addition to any other authorities conferred upon the governor, if the
governor issues an executive order declaring a state of emergency, the
governor may:
(a)  utilize all available resources of state government as reasonably
necessary to cope with a state of emergency;
(b)  employ measures and give direction to state and local officers and
agencies which are reasonable and necessary for the purpose of securing
compliance with the provisions of this act and with orders, rules and
regulations made pursuant to this act;
(c)  recommend and advise the evacuation of all or part of the population from
any stricken or threatened area within the state if necessary for the
preservation of life;
(d)  recommend routes, modes of transportation, and destination in connection
with evacuation;
(e)  in connection with evacuation, suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or
transportation of alcoholic beverages, explosives, and combustibles, not to
include the lawful bearing of arms;
(f)  control ingress and egress to and from a disaster area, the movement of
persons within the area, and recommend the occupancy or evacuation of premises
in a disaster area;
(g)  clear or remove from publicly or privately owned land or water debris or
wreckage that is an immediate threat to public health, public safety, or
private property, including allowing an employee of a state department or
agency designated by the governor to enter upon private land or waters and
perform any tasks necessary for the removal or clearance operation if the
political subdivision, corporation, organization, or individual that is
affected by the removal of the debris or wreckage:
(i)  presents an unconditional authorization for removal of the debris or
wreckage from private property; and
(ii)  agrees to indemnify the state against any claim arising from the removal
of the debris or wreckage;
(h)  enter into agreement with any agency of the United States:
(i)  for temporary housing units to be occupied by victims of a state of
emergency or persons who assist victims of a state of emergency; and
(ii)  to make the housing units described in Subsection (1)(h)(i) available to
a political subdivision of this state;
(i)  assist any political subdivision of this state to acquire sites and
utilities necessary for temporary housing units described in Subsection
(1)(h)(i) by passing through any funds made available to the governor by an
agency of the United States for this purpose;
(j)  subject to Sections 63K-4-401 and 63K-4-406, temporarily suspend or
modify by executive order, during the state of emergency, any public health,
safety, zoning, transportation, or other requirement of a statute or
administrative rule within this state if such action is essential to provide
temporary housing described in Subsection (1)(h)(i);
(k)  upon determination that a political subdivision of the state will suffer
a substantial loss of tax and other revenues because of a state of emergency
and the political subdivision so affected has demonstrated a need for
financial assistance to perform its governmental functions, in accordance with
Utah Constitution, Article XIV, Sections 3 and 4, and Section 10-8-6:
(i)  apply to the federal government for a loan on behalf of the political
subdivision if the amount of the loan that the governor applies for does not
exceed 25% of the annual operating budget of the political subdivision for the
fiscal year in which the state of emergency occurs; and
(ii)  receive and disburse the amount of the loan to the political
subdivision;
(l)  accept funds from the federal government and make grants to any political
subdivision for the purpose of removing debris or wreckage from publicly owned
land or water;
(m)  upon determination that financial assistance is essential to meet
expenses related to a state of emergency of individuals or families adversely
affected by the state of emergency that cannot be sufficiently met from other
means of assistance, apply for, accept, and expend a grant by the federal
government to fund the financial assistance, subject to the terms and
conditions imposed upon the grant; or
(n)  recommend to the Legislature other actions the governor considers to be
necessary to address a state of emergency.
(2)  A person who fraudulently or willfully makes a misstatement of fact in
connection with an application for financial assistance under this section
shall, upon conviction of each offense, be subject to a fine of not more than
$5,000 or imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.
